test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v2_aikkoot_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - aikkoot - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     aikkoot+V+Inf: aikkoot
     aikkoot+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aijon
     aikkoot+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: aijot
     aikkoot+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aikkoo
     aikkoot+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: aijoma
     aikkoot+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: aijotta
     aikkoot+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: aijothaan
     aikkoot+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: aijoin
     aikkoot+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: aijoit
     aikkoot+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: aikoi
     aikkoot+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: aijoima
     aikkoot+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: aijoitta
     aikkoot+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: aijothiin
     aikkoot+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: aikonu
     aikkoot+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: aijottu
     aikkoot+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: aikonheet
     aikkoot+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: aikkoova
     aikkoot+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: aikkoovat
     aikkoot+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: aijottava
     aikkoot+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: aijottavat
  
     aikkoot+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: aikoisin
     aikkoot+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: aikoisit
     aikkoot+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: aikois
     aikkoot+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: aikoisimma
     aikkoot+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: aikoisitta
     aikkoot+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: aijottais
     aikkoot+V+Pass+Cond: aijottais
  
     aikkoot+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: aijo
     aikkoot+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: aikokkaa
     
     aikkoot+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: aikomassa
     aikkoot+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: aikomasta
     aikkoot+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: aikomhaan
     aikkoot+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: aikomalla
     aikkoot+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: aikomatta
